Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 6. Sale, Assignment and Transfer

§ 12-4-601.
Transfer of license location; transfer of ownership; fee.

After public hearing and with the approval of the licensing authority, a license or permit may be transferred to or renewed on different premises on the same basis as the original application. An additional license fee of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) is required for the remaining term of the license or permit. A transferred license or permit shall expire on the same date as the original license or permit.

A licensee, or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased licensee, may assign and transfer the license or permit by a sale made in good faith. The assignment and transfer shall first have the approval of the licensing authority, which consideration shall be based in part upon a public hearing and an application filed under oath by the assignee or transferee showing the person or entity to be qualified to hold a license or permit under Wyoming law. The approval of the transfer shall not be given by the licensing authority if the transferring licensee is certified by the department as sixty (60) or more days delinquent in paying sales taxes pursuant to W.S.

12-2-306

, or if proceedings are pending to suspend, revoke or otherwise penalize the original license or permit holder. A transfer of a license or permit shall require the payment of an additional license fee to the appropriate licensing authority of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for the transfer, and upon assignment the assignee may exercise the privilege of continuing the business authorized by the license or permit.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 8; 1941, ch. 90, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 53-208; Laws 1949, ch. 136, § 2; 1955, ch. 228, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-13; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-110; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1996, ch. 122, § 2; 2011, ch. 5, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b), substituted “the transferring licensee is certified by the department as sixty (60) or more days delinquent in paying sales taxes” for “proceedings, including an action to collect delinquent sales tax payments,” and inserted “or if proceedings” in the third sentence.

Laws 2011, ch. 5 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

Most of the annotations below were taken from cases decided prior to the 1978 revision of this title.

Liquor license is privilege.

Johnson v. Smith, 455 P.2d 244,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1969).

A liquor license is deemed a privilege. Berry v. Arapahoe & Shoshone Tribes, 420 F. Supp. 934, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12845 (D. Wyo. 1976).

Security interest may attach to license. —

A liquor license issued under this section is property in which a valid security interest can be acquired under the Uniform Commercial Code and the security interest attaches to the proceeds when the liquor license is sold. Bogus v. American Nat'l Bank, 401 F.2d 458, 1968 U.S. App. LEXIS 5321 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1968).

Transfer void if provisions not followed. —

A note and mortgage given in exchange for the transfer of a retail liquor business and the accompanying state liquor license were illegal, void and unenforceable since the provisions of this section relating to the transfer of licenses were not followed. Scranton v. Whitlock, 389 P.2d 1015,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1964).

Lease provision requiring transfer of license to lessor valid, subject to authority's approval. —

A declaratory judgment was available to construe the provision of a lease containing the requirement that the lessees transfer their liquor license to the lessor at the conclusion of the lease. Such a provision was valid and enforceable as between the parties, but was subject to the provisions of subsection (b), requiring a public hearing and approval by the licensing authority. Kurpjuweit v. Northwestern Dev. Co., 708 P.2d 39,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 584

(Wyo. 1985).

Operation of business by one other than licensee precluded. —

This section, if interpreted reasonably, would seem to preclude the operation of a retail liquor business in the state by one person when the license to that business is in the name of another. Scranton v. Whitlock, 389 P.2d 1015,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1964).

Statute not intended to protect from physical injury. —

This statute and §

12-4-604

are not intended to protect the general public from physical injury. The requirement that liquor licenses only be transferred according to statute serves to assure that the regulatory authorities can administer the licensing process in an orderly fashion and that the operator of a retail liquor establishment be exposed to the scrutiny of the licensing process including a public hearing. Dubray v. Howshar, 884 P.2d 23,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1994).

Judicial review not provided for. —

This is the only section which deals with transfer of license to a different location. It mentions no appeal from a decision of the council which is either in favor of or against such transfer. Whitesides v. Council of Cheyenne, 78 Wyo. 80, 319 P.2d 520,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1957).

Applied

in

Hill v. Hamilton, 368 P.2d 957,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1962).

Quoted

in

Cheever v. Warren, 70 Wyo. 296, 249 P.2d 163,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1952).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Bayou Liquors, Inc. v. City of Casper, 906 P.2d 1046,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Intoxicating Liquors; Liquor License Transfer; Liens on Liquor Licenses,” see Land & Water L. Rev. 213 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Transfer of retail liquor license or permit from one location to another, 98 ALR2d 1123.

§ 12-4-602.
Annexations; transfer of licensing jurisdiction; licenses transferred exempt from population formula.

The licensed premises of a license issued by a county which is located within an area annexed into the corporate limits of a city or town shall be transferred to the licensing jurisdiction of that city or town.

Any transfer of jurisdiction provided within this section shall not require the payment of any additional fee for the transfer.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

A license transferred pursuant to annexation shall be exempt from the population formula restrictions provided by W.S.

12-4-201

and

12-4-413

.

As used in this section, “license” includes a county malt beverage permit. A city or town shall charge the same fee for a county malt beverage permit as the county.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1996, ch. 122, § 2; 2006, ch. 106, § 2; 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added “and

12-4-413

” in (d).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (c), which read, "A county license transferred within the jurisdiction of a city or town pursuant to annexation shall not be transferred to or renewed on different premises within the city or town for a period of six (6) years after the transfer of jurisdiction."

§ 12-4-603.
Annexation of retail liquor license or malt beverage permit into 5-mile zone; renewal.

A county retail liquor license having licensed premises located within a five (5) mile zone around an incorporated city or town because of annexation of property shall not be denied an application for renewal by reason of annexation alone.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 2021 ch. 22, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in (a), deleted "or malt beverage permit" following "liquor license" in the first sentence and deleted the second sentence, which read, "The license or permit shall be subject to renewal by the county licensing authority in the same manner as if the licensed premises were beyond the five (5) mile zone around a city or town."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b), which read, "A county retail liquor license or malt beverage permit renewed in accordance with subsection (a) of this section shall not be transferred to or renewed on different premises within a five (5) mile zone around an incorporated city or town for a period of six (6) years following the date of annexation of property."

§ 12-4-604.
Transfer or sale of license or permit; attachment, garnishment or execution.

No license or permit shall be transferred or sold except as provided by W.S.

12-4-601

and

12-4-602

, used for any place not described in the license or permit at the time of issuance or subject to attachment, garnishment or execution.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "and

12-4-602

" for "through

12-4-603

."

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liquor license as subject to execution or attachment, 40 ALR4th 927.